Washington statutes.
RCW 10.99.050

Victim contact—Restriction, prohibition—Violation, penalties—Written order—Procedures—Notice of change.

(1) When a defendant is found guilty of a crime and a condition of the sentence restricts the defendant's ability to have contact with the victim, such condition shall be recorded and a written certified copy of that order shall be provided to the victim.

(2)(a) Willful violation of a court order issued under this section is punishable under RCW 7.105.450.

(b) The written order shall contain the court's directives and shall bear the legend: Violation of this order is a criminal offense under chapter 7.105 RCW and will subject a violator to arrest; any assault, drive-by shooting, or reckless endangerment that is a violation of this order is a felony.

(c) An order issued pursuant to this section in conjunction with a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor sentence or juvenile disposition remains in effect for a fixed period of time determined by the court, which may not exceed five years from the date of sentencing or disposition.

(d) An order issued pursuant to this section in conjunction with a felony sentence or juvenile disposition remains in effect for a fixed period of time determined by the court, which may not exceed the adult maximum sentence established in RCW 9A.20.021.

(3) Whenever an order prohibiting contact is issued pursuant to this section, the clerk of the court shall forward a copy of the order on or before the next judicial day to the appropriate law enforcement agency specified in the order. Upon receipt of the copy of the order the law enforcement agency shall enter the order for one year or until the expiration date specified on the order into any computer-based criminal intelligence information system available in this state used by law enforcement agencies to list outstanding warrants. Entry into the computer-based criminal intelligence information system constitutes notice to all law enforcement agencies of the existence of the order. The order is fully enforceable in any jurisdiction in the state.

(4) If an order prohibiting contact issued pursuant to this section is modified or terminated, the clerk of the court shall notify the law enforcement agency specified in the order on or before the next judicial day. Upon receipt of notice that an order has been terminated, the law enforcement agency shall remove the order from any computer-based criminal intelligence system.

[ 2021 c 215 s 123; 2019 c 263 s 303; 2000 c 119 s 20; 1997 c 338 s 55; 1996 c 248 s 8; 1991 c 301 s 5; 1985 c 303 s 12; 1984 c 263 s 24; 1979 ex.s. c 105 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.

Findings—Intent—Domestic violence no-contact orders—2019 c 263 ss 302 and 303: "(1) The legislature believes the existing language of RCW 10.99.050 has always authorized courts to issue domestic violence no-contact orders in adult and juvenile cases that last up to the adult statutory maximum in felony cases and up to the maximum period for which an adult sentence can be suspended or deferred in nonfelony cases. However, in State v. Granath, 200 Wn. App. 26, 401 P.3d 405 (2017), aff'd, 190 Wn.2d 548, 415 P.3d 1179 (2018), the court of appeals and supreme court recently interpreted this provision to limit domestic violence no-contact orders in nonfelony sentences to the duration of the defendant's conditions of sentence. The legislature finds that this interpretation inadequately protects victims of domestic violence. The legislature intends to clarify the trial courts' authority to issue no-contact orders that remain in place in adult and juvenile nonfelony cases for the maximum period of time that an adult sentence could be suspended, and in adult and juvenile felony cases for the adult statutory maximum.

(2) The legislature further finds that there is a discrepancy in which sentences for nonfelony domestic violence offenses can be suspended for up to five years in district and municipal courts, but only for up to two years in superior courts in most cases, creating inconsistent protection for victims. The legislature intends to rectify this discrepancy to allow nonfelony domestic violence sentences to be suspended for up to five years in all courts." [ 2019 c 263 s 301.]

Findings—Intent—2019 c 263 ss 202-803: See note following RCW 10.01.240.

Application—2000 c 119: See note following RCW 10.31.100.

Finding—Evaluation—Report—1997 c 338: See note following RCW 13.40.0357.

Severability—Effective dates—1997 c 338: See notes following RCW 5.60.060.

Finding—1991 c 301: See note following RCW 10.99.020.